New Jersey, session 221, A717.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a. There are appropriated from the Property Tax Relief Fund to the Department of Education such amounts as are necessary to ensure that a school district that meets the criteria set forth in subsection b. of this section shall receive an additional amount of State school aid in the 2022-2023 school year that is equal to the total amount of reductions experienced by the district in any of the school years 2018-2019 through 2021-2022. b. The provisions of this section shall apply to any school district that experienced a State aid reduction during any of the school years 2018-2019 through 2021-2022 because: (1) it had a State aid ratio in the 2017-2018 and 2018-2019 school years greater than 1.00, as determined in accordance with the provisions of the fiscal year 2019 appropriations act; (2) it had a State aid ratio for the 2017-2018 school year that was less than 1.00 and a State aid ratio for the 2018-2019 school year that was greater than 1.00, as determined in accordance with the provisions of the fiscal year 2019 appropriations act; or (3) it had a State aid differential, as that term is defined pursuant to section 3 of P.L.2018, c.67 (C.18A:7F-67), that was positive in any of the school years 2019-2020 through 2021-2022. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.